New Jersey, session 221, S54.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.139 (C.2A:53A-26) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in [this act] P.L.1995, c.139 (C.2A:53A-26 et seq.) , "licensed person" means any person who is licensed as: a.     an accountant pursuant to P.L.1997, c.259 (C.45:2B-42 et seq.); b.    an architect pursuant to R.S.45:3-1 et seq.; c.     an attorney admitted to practice law in New Jersey; d.    a dentist pursuant to R.S.45:6-1 et seq.; e.     an engineer pursuant to P.L.1938, c.342 (C.45:8-27 et seq.); f.     a physician in the practice of medicine or surgery pursuant to R.S.45:9-1 et seq.; g.    a podiatrist pursuant to R.S.45:5-1 et seq.; h.    a chiropractor pursuant to P.L.1989, c.153 (C.45:9-41.17 et seq.); i.     a registered professional nurse pursuant to P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-23 et seq.); j.     a health care facility as defined in section 2 of P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-2); k.    a physical therapist pursuant to P.L.1983, c.296 (C.45:9-37.11 et seq.); l.     a land surveyor pursuant to P.L.1938, c.342 (C.45:8-27 et seq.); m.   a registered pharmacist pursuant to P.L.2003, c.280 (C.45:14-40 et seq.); n.    a veterinarian pursuant to R.S.45:16-1 et seq.; o.    an insurance producer pursuant to P.L.2001, c.210 (C.17:22A-26 et seq.); p.    a certified midwife, certified professional midwife, or certified nurse midwife pursuant to R.S.45:10-1 et seq.; and q.    a licensed site remediation professional pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-7). As used in P.L.1995, c.139 (C.2A:53A-26 et seq.), licensed person shall also mean a person designated as an enrolled agent by the federal Internal Revenue Service. (cf: P.L.2019, c.263, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 30th day next following enactment and apply to causes of action filed on or after that date.